en: Light Ropes & Strings
xx: Light Ropes & Strings
cs: Světelné trubice a pruty
da: Lysbånd og -strenge
de: Lichtschläuche & Lichterketten
es: Mangueras y guirnaldas de luces
fr: Guirlandes et cordons lumineux, Guirlandes électriques, Guirlande électrique
it: Tubi luminosi e luminarie
ja: ロープライト
nl: Lichtslangen
no: Lystau og -tråder
pl: Przewody i węże świetlne
pt: Luzes de Natal
ru: Световые шнуры и ленты
sv: Rep och linor för lampor
tr: Işık İp ve Telleri

en: Lighting Fixtures
xx: Lighting Fixtures
cs: Svítidla
da: Belysning – beslag
de: Leuchten
es: Lámparas Fijas
fr: Appareils d'éclairage
it: Impianti di illuminazione
ja: 照明器具
nl: Lichtarmaturen
no: Lysarmaturer
pl: Oprawy oświetleniowe
pt: Instalações de iluminação
ru: Светильники
sv: Lamphållare
tr: Aydınlatma Teçhizatı

en: Cabinet Light Fixtures
xx: Cabinet Light Fixtures
cs: Nábytkové osvětlení
da: Lampebeslag til skabe
de: Unterbauleuchten
es: Iluminación bajo muebles
fr: Fixations pour éclairage sous meuble
it: Illuminazioni per armadio
ja: 棚下照明器具
nl: Kastverlichting
no: Lysarmatur til skap
pl: Lampy meblowe
pt: Instalações de luzes para gabinete
ru: Светильники для мебели
sv: Skåplamparmaturer
tr: Dolap Aydınlatma Teçhizatları

en: Ceiling Light Fixtures
xx: Ceiling Light Fixtures
cs: Stropní svítidla
da: Loftslampebeslag
de: Deckenleuchten
es: Apliques de techo
fr: Plafonniers, Plafonnier
it: Impianti da soffitto
ja: 天井照明器具
nl: Plafondverlichting
no: Takarmaturer
pl: Sufitowe oprawy oświetleniowe
pt: Instalações de luzes de teto
ru: Потолочные светильники
sv: Taklamphållare
tr: Tavan Aydınlatma Teçhizatı

en: Chandeliers
xx: Chandeliers
cs: Lustry
da: Lysekroner
de: Kronleuchter
es: Lámparas de araña
fr: Lustres, Lustre
it: Lampadari
ja: シャンデリア
nl: Kroonluchters
no: Lysekroner
pl: Żyrandole
pt: Candelabro
ru: Люстры
sv: Takkronor
tr: Avizeler

en: Wall Light Fixtures
xx: Wall Light Fixtures
cs: Uchycení nástěnných svítidel
da: Væglampebeslag
de: Wandleuchten, Wandbeleuchtung
es: Apliques de pared
fr: Lampe murales
it: Illuminazione a parete
ja: 壁付け照明器具
nl: Muurverlichting
no: Veggarmaturer
pl: Ścienne oprawy oświetleniowe
pt: Luzes de parede
ru: Настенные светильники
sv: Vägglamphållare
tr: Duvar Aydınlatma Teçhizatı

en: Night Lights & Ambient Lighting
xx: Night Lights & Ambient Lighting
cs: Noční a náladové osvětlení
da: Natlamper
de: Nachtlichter & indirekte Beleuchtung
es: Luces nocturnas e iluminación ambiente
fr: Veilleuses et lampes d'ambiance
it: Luci notturne e soffuse
ja: 常夜灯・アンビエント照明
nl: Nacht- en sfeerverlichting
no: Nattlys og omgivelseslys
pl: Lampki nocne i iluminacja
pt: Lâmpadas para luz ambiente ou noturna
ru: Ночные светильники и подсветка
sv: Nattlampor och omgivande belysning
tr: Gece Lambaları ve Ortam Aydınlatma

en: Picture Lights
xx: Picture Lights
cs: Bodová světla
da: Billedrammebelysning
de: Bilderbeleuchtung
es: Iluminación para cuadros
fr: Éclairage de tableaux
it: Lampade per quadri
ja: ピクチャーライト
nl: Schilderijverlichting
no: Bildelys
pl: Oświetlenie obrazów
pt: Iluminação fotográfica
ru: Подсветка для картин
sv: Tavellampor
tr: Tablo Işıkları

en: Tiki Torches & Oil Lamps
xx: Tiki Torches & Oil Lamps
cs: Venkovní pochodně a olejové lampy
da: Tiki-fakler og -olielamper
de: Tiki-Fackeln & Öllampen
es: Antorchas tiki y lámparas de aceite
fr: Torches de jardin et lampes à huile
it: Torce in bambù e lampade a olio
ja: たいまつ・オイルランプ
nl: Tikitoortsen en olielampen
no: Fakler og oljelamper
pl: Pochodnie tiki i lampy oliwne
pt: Tochas de bambu e lamparinas à óleo
ru: Бамбуковые факелы и масляные лампы
sv: Tikilyktor och oljelampor
tr: Tiki Meşaleler ve Gaz Lambaları

en: Track Lighting
xx: Track Lighting
cs: Kolejnicová svítidla
da: Lampeskinner
de: Lichtschienensysteme
es: Iluminación en rieles
fr: Éclairage sur rail
it: Illuminazione a binario
ja: レール式可動照明
nl: Railverlichting
no: Spotbelysning
pl: Listwy oświetleniowe
pt: Iluminação em trilhos
ru: Реечные светильники
sv: Belysningsskenor
tr: Parkur Işıkları

en: Track Lighting Accessories
xx: Track Lighting Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke kolejnicovým svítidlům
da: Lampeskinner – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Lichtschienensysteme
es: Accesorios de iluminación en rieles
fr: Accessoires pour systèmes d'éclairage en rails
it: Accessori per illuminazione a binario
ja: レール式可動照明部品
nl: Accessoires voor railverlichting
no: Tilbehør til spotbelysning
pl: Akcesoria do listew oświetleniowych
pt: Acessórios para iluminação em trilho
ru: Принадлежности для реечных светильников
sv: Tillbehör till belysningsskenor
tr: Raylı Aydınlatma Aksesuarları

en: Track Lighting Fixtures
xx: Track Lighting Fixtures
cs: Montážní prvky kolejnicových svítidel
da: Lampeskinner – beslag
de: Leuchten für Lichtschienensysteme
es: Dispositivos de iluminación en rieles
fr: Lumières pour rails d'éclairage
it: Illuminazione file di faretti
ja: レール式可動照明取付具
nl: Armaturen voor railverlichting
no: Armaturer til spotbelysning
pl: Oprawy listew oświetleniowych
pt: Instalações de iluminação em trilha
ru: Элементы крепления для реечных светильников
sv: Lamphållare till belysningsskenor
tr: Raylı Aydınlatma Teçhizatı

en: Track Lighting Rails
xx: Track Lighting Rails
cs: Kolejnice ke kolejnicovým svítidlům
da: Lampeskinner – skinner
de: Schienen für Lichtschienensysteme
es: Rieles para iluminación
fr: Rails d'éclairage
it: Guide per illuminazione a binario
ja: 照明用レール
nl: Rails voor railverlichting
no: Lysskinner
pl: Ramy listew oświetleniowych
pt: Trilhos para iluminação
ru: Шины для реечных светильников
sv: Skenor till belysningsskenor
tr: Tavan Aydınlatma Rayları

en: Lighting Accessories
xx: Lighting Accessories
cs: Osvětlení – příslušenství
da: Belysning – tilbehør
de: Beleuchtungszubehör
es: Accesorios de iluminación
fr: Accessoires pour luminaires
it: Accessori illuminazione
ja: 照明部品
nl: Verlichtingsaccessoires
no: Belysningstilbehør
pl: Akcesoria oświetleniowe
pt: Acessórios para iluminação
ru: Принадлежности для освещения
sv: Lamptillbehör
tr: Aydınlatma Aksesuarları

en: Lamp Post Bases
xx: Lamp Post Bases
cs: Stojany na lampy
da: Fødder til lygtepæle
de: Laternensockel
es: Bases para farolas
fr: Bases de lampadaires
it: Basi per lampioni
ja: 街灯用基礎
nl: Voetstukken voor lantaarnpalen
no: Sokler til lyktestolper
pl: Podstawy pod lampy
pt: Suportes para poste de iluminação
ru: Основания фонарных столбов
sv: Baser för lyktstolpar
tr: Lamba Direği Tabanları

en: Lamp Post Mounts
xx: Lamp Post Mounts
cs: Držáky na lampy
da: Beslag til lygtepæle
de: Laternenhalterungen
es: Soportes para farolas
fr: Socles de lampadaires
it: Supporti per lampioni
ja: 街灯取り付け具
nl: Bevestigingsmateriaal voor lantaarnpalen
no: Fundamenter til lyktestolper
pl: Mocowania do lamp
pt: Montagem de poste de iluminação
ru: Опоры для фонарных столбов
sv: Infattningar för lyktstolpar
tr: Lamba Direği Yuvaları

en: Lamp Shades
xx: Lamp Shades
cs: Stínítka na lampy
da: Lampeskærme
de: Lampenschirme
es: Pantallas para lámparas
fr: Abat-jour
it: Paraluce per la casa
ja: ランプシェード
nl: Lampenkappen
no: Lampeskjermer
pl: Klosze lamp
pt: Abajures
ru: Абажуры
sv: Lampskärmar
tr: Abajurlar

en: Lighting Timers
xx: Lighting Timers
cs: Časovače osvětlení
da: Belysning – timere
de: Beleuchtungszeitschaltuhren
es: Temporizadores para luz
fr: Minuteries d'éclairage
it: Timer per lampade
ja: 照明用タイマー
nl: Verlichtingstimers
no: Lystimere
pl: Wyłączniki czasowe oświetlenia
pt: Temporizadores de iluminação
ru: Таймеры освещения
sv: Belysningstimers
tr: Işık Zamanlayıcıları

en: Oil Lamp Fuel
xx: Oil Lamp Fuel
cs: Palivo do olejových lamp
da: Olie til olielamper
de: Brennstoff für Öllampen
es: Combustible para candiles
fr: Combustible pour lampes à huile
it: Combustibile per lampade a petrolio
ja: オイルランプ用燃料
nl: Lampolie
no: Olje til oljelampe
pl: Paliwo do lamp naftowych
pt: Combustíveis para lâmpada a óleo
ru: Топливо для масляной лампы
sv: Bränsle till oljelampa
tr: Gaz Lambası Yakıtı

en: Linens & Bedding
xx: Linens & Bedding
cs: Prádlo
da: Linned og sengetøj
de: Bett- und Haushaltswäsche
es: Ropa de casa
fr: Linge, Linge de maison
it: Biancheria
ja: テーブルリネン・寝具
nl: Linnengoed
no: Lintøy og sengetøy
pl: Bielizna stołowa i pościelowa
pt: Lençóis e roupas de cama
ru: Постельное бельё
sv: Linne och sängkläder
tr: Yatak Çarşaf ve Nevresimleri